Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3067.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 34 O.S. 2021, Section 25, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 25. Whenever any measure shall be initiated by the
people in the manner provided by law, or whenever the referendum
shall be demanded against any measure passed by the Legislature,
same shall be submitted to the people for their approval or
rejection at the next regular election that falls on the first
Tuesday in November; provided, the Governor shall have power, in his
or her discretion, to call a special election to vote upon such
questions, or to designate the mandatory primary election as a
special election for such purpose before the first Tuesday in
November; and, the official ballot title and measure is transmitted
Req. No. 14406 Page 1

from the Secretary of State to the State Election Board not fewer
than seventy (70) days from the date of the next General Election
pursuant to Section 12-116 of Title 26 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14406 MJ 01/09/26


















Req. No. 14406 Page 2